Utah statutes.
76-6-601.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Merchandise" means any personal property displayed, held or offered for
sale by a merchant.
(2)  "Merchant" means an owner or operator of any retail mercantile
establishment where merchandise is displayed, held or offered for sale and
includes the merchant's employees, servants or agents.
(3)  "Minor" means any unmarried person under 18 years of age.
(4)  "Peace officer" has the same meaning as provided in Title 53, Chapter 13,
Peace Officer Classifications.
(5)  "Premises of a retail mercantile establishment" includes, but is not
limited to, the retail mercantile establishment; any common use areas in
shopping centers and all parking lots or areas set aside for the benefit of
those patrons of the retail mercantile establishment.
(6)  "Retail mercantile establishment" means any place where merchandise is
displayed, held, or offered for sale to the public.
(7)  "Retail value" means the merchant's stated or advertised price of the
merchandise.
(8)  "Shopping cart" means those push carts of the types which are commonly
provided by grocery stores, drug stores, or other mercantile establishments or
markets for the use of the public in transporting commodities in stores and
markets from the store to a place outside the store.
(9)  "Under-ring" means to cause the cash register or other sales recording
device to reflect less than the retail value of the merchandise.
